Illinois, session 104th, SB57.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Property Control Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.3 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 605/7.3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 133b10.3)7    Sec. 7.3. Administrator; transferable property. 8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the 9The Administrator shall have charge of all transferable 10property and shall have authority to take possession and 11control of such property in order to transfer or assign any 12such property to any other State agency that has need or use 13for such property or to dispose of said property in accordance 14with Section 7 of this Act.15    (b) The Administrator may not dispose of a transferable 16airplane by sale until he or she determines that (i) the agency 17no longer has a need for the airplane, (ii) the airplane will 18not be used as a trade-in on another aircraft, and (iii) no 19public university or college in Illinois that offers courses 20in aviation, flight training, or other subjects involving 21knowledge of the workings of an airplane has listed the need 22for an airplane as provided in this Section.23    (c) In addition to the powers granted to the Administrator   SB0057- 2 -LRB104 08154 HLH 18202 b1under this Section, the Board of Trustees of a public 2university or college in Illinois that offers courses in 3aviation, flight training, or other subjects involving 4knowledge of the workings of an airplane may dispose of a 5qualified transferable airplane by sale to a bona fide 6purchaser for value and on such terms as the Board shall 7determine are in the best interests of that public university 8or college and are consistent with that university's or 9college's objects and purposes. If the Board of Trustees or 10the Administrator sells a qualified transferable airplane, 11then the public university or college may retain the proceeds 12from the sale in a separate account for the purpose of 13maintaining the university's or college's fleet of aircraft or 14for the purpose of purchasing replacement aircraft. The 15Auditor General shall examine the separate account to ensure 16that the use or deposit of the proceeds authorized under this 17subsection (c) is in a manner consistent with the purposes set 18forth in this subsection. As used in this subsection, 19"qualified transferable airplane" means a transferable 20airplane that is owned by a public university or college in 21Illinois and that is used for instruction in aviation, flight 22training, or other subjects involving knowledge of the 23workings of an airplane. 24    (d) Responsible officers shall periodically report all 25transferable property at locations under their jurisdictions 26to the Administrator. The Administrator shall review such   SB0057- 3 -LRB104 08154 HLH 18202 b1reports and arrange for physical examination of said property 2if necessary to determine if said items of transferable 3property should be transferred to another State agency, 4transferred to a central warehouse, or disposed of. The 5Administrator shall advise responsible officers of the results 6of these reviews as necessary.7    (e) The staff under the jurisdiction of the Administrator 8shall review as necessary State agencies' inventories for 9potential items of transferable property. If in the opinion of 10the Administrator's staff, any property appears to be 11transferable, the Administrator shall notify the responsible 12officer of his determination. The executive head of the agency 13holding the property in question may appeal the determination 14in writing to the Administrator.15    (f) The Administrator will review the determination in 16accordance with rules and procedures established pursuant to 17Section 5 of this Act.18    (g) The Administrator shall maintain lists of transferable 19property and of State agency needs for such property and will 20transfer where appropriate listed transferable property to 21agencies listing their needs for such property as detailed by 22their responsible officers. The Administrator must give 23priority for transfer of an airplane, that is not to be used as 24a trade-in, to a public university or college in Illinois that 25offers courses in aviation, flight training, or other subjects 26involving knowledge of the workings of an airplane and that   SB0057- 4 -LRB104 08154 HLH 18202 b1has listed the need for an airplane.2(Source: P.A. 91-432, eff. 1-1-00.)